en: Dishwasher Cleaners
xx: Dishwasher Cleaners
cs: Čističe na myčky nádobí
da: Opvaskemaskinerens
de: Spülmaschinenreiniger
es: Limpiadores de lavavajillas
fr: Produits nettoyants pour lave-vaisselle
it: Detersivi per lavastoviglie
ja: 食器洗浄機用洗剤
nl: Vaatwasmachinereinigers
no: Rens til oppvaskmaskiner
pl: Środki do czyszczenia zmywarek
pt: Limpadores para lava-louças
ru: Средства для чистки посудомоечных машин
sv: Rengöringsmedel för diskmaskiner
tr: Bulaşık Makinesi Deterjanları

en: Dishwasher tablets
de: Geschirrspültabs
es: Pastillas para lavavajillas
fr: Tablettes pour lave-vaisselle

en: Fabric & Upholstery Cleaners
xx: Fabric & Upholstery Cleaners
cs: Čističe látek a čalounění
da: Stof- og møbelrens
de: Textil- & Polsterreiniger
es: Limpiadores de tejidos y tapizados
fr: Produits d'entretien pour tissus et textiles d'ameublement
it: Prodotti per la pulizia di tessuti e tappezzerie
ja: 布製品用洗剤
nl: Textiel- en bekledingsreinigers
no: Stoff- og møbelrens
pl: Środki do czyszczenia tkanin i obić
pt: Limpadores de tecidos e estofados
ru: Средства для чистки ткани и обивки
sv: Rengöringsmedel för tyger och överdrag
tr: Kumaş ve Döşeme Temizleyiciler

en: Floor Cleaners
xx: Floor Cleaners
cs: Čističe na dřevěné podlahy
da: Trægulvssæbe
de: Bodenreiniger
es: Productos de limpieza para parqué
fr: Produits d'entretien pour les sols
it: Lavapavimenti
ja: フローリングクリーナー
nl: Reinigers voor hardhouten vloeren
no: Rengjøringsmidler til gulv
pl: Środki do czyszczenia podłóg drewnianych
pt: Limpadores para piso de madeira
ru: Средства для очистки паркета
sv: Golvrengöringsmedel
tr: Zemin Temizleyiciler

en: Furniture Cleaners & Polish
xx: Furniture Cleaners & Polish
cs: Čistící a leštící prostředky na nábytek
da: Møbelrens og pudsemiddel
de: Möbelreiniger & -Politur
es: Cera y productos de limpieza de muebles
fr: Produits nettoyants et cirages pour meubles
it: Detergenti e lucidi per mobili
ja: 家具クリーナー・艶出し剤
nl: Meubelreiniging en wrijfmiddelen
no: Møbelrens og polish
pl: Środki do czyszczenia i polerowania mebli
pt: Limpadores e polidores de mobiliário
ru: Средства для чистки и полировки мебели
sv: Rengöringsmedel och polermedel för möbler
tr: Mobilya Temizleyici ve Parlatıcıları

en: Glass & Surface Cleaners
xx: Glass & Surface Cleaners
cs: Čističe na sklo a jiné povrchy
da: Glas- og overfladerens
de: Glas- & Oberflächenreiniger
es: Productos de limpieza para superficies y cristales
fr: Produits nettoyants pour vitres et surfaces vitrées
it: Detergenti vetri e superfici
ja: ガラスクリーナー
nl: Glas- en oppervlaktereinigers
no: Rens for glass og harde overflater
pl: Środki do czyszczenia powierzchni szklanych
pt: Limpadores de superfície e vidros
ru: Средства для чистки стекла и гладких поверхностей
sv: Rengöringsmedel för glas och blanka ytor
tr: Cam ve Yüzey Temizleyiciler

en: Glass Cleaners
xx: Glass Cleaners
cs: Čističe na sklo
da: Glasrens
de: Glasreiniger
es: Limpiacristal
fr: Lave-vitres
it: Detergente vetri
ja: ガラス用クリーナー
nl: Glasreinigers
no: Vindusvaskemidler
pl: Środki czyszczące do szkła
pt: Limpadores de vidro
ru: Очистители стекол
sv: Fönsterputs
tr: Cam Temizleyiciler

en: Muti-surface Cleaners
xx: Muti-surface Cleaners
cs: Univerzální čističe
da: Universalrengøringsmidler
de: Multi-Oberflächenreiniger
es: Limpiadores multisuperficies
fr: Nettoyants multi-surfaces
it: Detergenti multiuso
ja: マルチクリーナー
nl: Multi-oppervlaktereinigers
no: Rengjøringsmidler for alle overflater
pl: Środki czyszczące do różnych powierzchni
pt: Produtos de limpeza multiuso
ru: Очистители для различных поверхностей
sv: Allrengöring
tr: Yüzey Temizleyiciler

en: Household Disinfectants
xx: Household Disinfectants
cs: Domácí dezinfekční prostředky
da: Desinfektionsmidler
de: Haushaltsdesinfektion
es: Desinfectantes domésticos
fr: Désinfectants ménagers
it: Disinfettanti domestici
ja: 家庭用殺菌消毒剤
nl: Ontsmettingsmiddelen voor woningen
no: Desinfeksjonsmidler
pl: Środki dezynfekujące do gospodarstwa domowego
pt: Desinfetantes domésticos
ru: Бытовые дезинфицирующие средства
sv: Desinfektionsmedel för hemmet
tr: Ev Dezenfektanları

en: Oven & Grill Cleaners
xx: Oven & Grill Cleaners
cs: Čističe na trouby a grily
da: Ovn- og grillrens
de: Backofen- & Grillreiniger
es: Limpiadores de hornos y parrillas
fr: Nettoyants pour fours et grils
it: Pulizia forno e grill
ja: オーブンクリーナー
nl: Oven- en grillreinigers
no: Ovn- og grillrens
pl: Środki do czyszczenia piekarnika
pt: Limpadores de forno e grelha
ru: Средства для чистки духовок и грилей
sv: Rengöringsmedel för ugnar
tr: Fırın ve Izgara Temizleyiciler

en: Pet Odor & Stain Removers
xx: Pet Odor & Stain Removers
cs: Odstraňovače skvrn a zápachu po zvířatech
da: Lugt- og pletfjerner – kæledyr
de: Tiergeruchs- & Fleckenentferner
es: Quitamanchas y neutralizadores de olores de mascotas
fr: Désodorisants et détachants pour animaux de compagnie
it: Prodotti elimina odori animali e smacchiatori
ja: ペットの匂い・汚れ除去剤
nl: Verwijderaars voor vlekken en dierengeur
no: Lukt- og flekkfjernere for kjæledyr
pl: Neutralizatory zapachów zwierzęcych i wywabiacze plam
pt: Removedores de odor e manchas para animais de estimação
ru: Средства для удаления запаха и пятен от животных
sv: Borttagningsmedel för lukt och fläckar från husdjur
tr: Evcil Hayvan Kokusu ve Lekesi Gidericiler

en: Rinse Aids
xx: Rinse Aids
cs: Přípravky na oplachování nádobí
da: Afspændingsmiddel
de: Klarspüler
es: Abrillantadores
fr: Produits de rinçage
it: Brillantanti
ja: 食器洗浄機用乾燥仕上剤
nl: Spoelmiddelen
no: Rensemidler til oppvaskmaskin
pl: Środki nabłyszczające
pt: Secante abrilhantador
ru: Ополаскиватели для посудомоечных машин
sv: Disksköljmedel
tr: Parlatıcılar

en: Stainless Steel Cleaners & Polishes
xx: Stainless Steel Cleaners & Polishes
cs: Čističe a politury na nerezovou ocel
da: Rengøring og polering af rustfrit stål
de: Edelstahlreiniger & -polituren
es: Limpiadores y abrillantadores para acero inoxidable
fr: Produits d'entretien et de polissage de l'acier inoxydable
it: Prodotti per pulizia e lucidatura di acciaio inossidabile
ja: ステンレスクリーナー・ポリッシュ
nl: Rvs-reinigers en -poetsmiddelen
no: Pusse- og rengjøringsmidler for rustfritt stål
pl: Środki do czyszczenia i polerowania stali nierdzewnej
pt: Limpadores e polidores para aço inoxidável
ru: Средства для чистки и полировки нержавеющей стали
sv: Rengörings- och polermedel för rostfritt stål
tr: Paslanmaz Çelik Temizleyiciler ve Parlatıcılar

en: Toilet Bowl Cleaners
xx: Toilet Bowl Cleaners
cs: Čističe na WC mísy
da: Toiletrens
de: Toilettenreiniger
es: Productos de limpieza para tazas de inodoro
fr: Produits nettoyants pour cuvettes WC
it: Prodotti pulizia water
ja: トイレ用洗剤
nl: Toiletreinigers
no: Toalettskålrens
pl: Środki do czyszczenia toalet
pt: Limpadores para vaso sanitário
ru: Средства для чистки унитазов
sv: Toalettrengöringsmedel
tr: Tuvalet Temizleyicileri

en: Toilet gel
de: Toilettengel
es: Gel WC
fr: Gel WC

en: Tub & Tile Cleaners
xx: Tub & Tile Cleaners
cs: Čističe van a dlaždic
da: Badekar- og fliserengøring
de: Wannen- & Kachelreiniger
es: Productos de limpieza para baños
fr: Produits nettoyants pour baignoire et carrelage salle de bain
it: Pulizia vasche e piastrelle
ja: お風呂用洗剤
nl: Schoonmaakmiddelen voor badkuip en tegels
no: Badekar- og flisrens
pl: Środki do czyszczenia wanien i ceramiki
pt: Limpadores para banheiras e azulejos
ru: Средства для чистки ванн и плитки
sv: Badkars- och kakelrengöring
tr: Küvet ve Karo Temizleyicileri

en: Washing Machine Cleaners
xx: Washing Machine Cleaners
cs: Čističe praček
da: Vaskemaskinerens
de: Waschmaschinenreiniger
es: Limpiadores para lavadoras
fr: Produits nettoyants pour lave-linge
it: Prodotti per la pulizia della lavastoviglie
ja: 洗濯槽クリーナー
nl: Wasmachinereinigers
no: Vaskemaskinrens
pl: Środki czyszczące do pralek
pt: Limpadores para máquinas de lavar roupa
ru: Средства для чистки стиральных машин
sv: Rengöringsmedel för tvättmaskiner
tr: Çamaşır Makinesi Deterjanları

en: Mop Heads & Refills
xx: Mop Heads & Refills
cs: Hlavice k mopu a náhradní mopy
da: Moppehoveder
de: Ersatz-Wischmops
es: Flecos para fregonas y recambios
fr: Têtes et recharges de balai
it: Ricariche e teste per mocio
ja: モップ用スペアヘッド
nl: Dweilmoppen
no: Mopper og påfyll
pl: Końcówki do mopów
pt: Refis para esfregões
ru: Запасные щётки для швабр
sv: Mopphuvuden och refills
tr: Mop Başlık ve Refilleri

en: Mops
xx: Mops
cs: Mopy
da: Mopper
de: Wischmops & Bodenwischer
es: Fregonas
fr: Balais à franges
it: Spazzoloni
ja: モップ
nl: Zwabbers
no: Mopper
pl: Mopy
pt: Esfregões
ru: Швабры
sv: Moppar
tr: Moplar

en: Scrub Brush Heads & Refills
xx: Scrub Brush Heads & Refills
cs: Náhradní hlavice kartáčů
da: Skurebørstehoveder og -refiller
de: Bodenwischeraufsätze
es: Cabezales para cepillos de limpieza y recambios
fr: Têtes de brosses de nettoyage
it: Ricambi per spazzole
ja: デッキブラシヘッド
nl: Borstelkoppen
no: Refillskluter og hoder til skrubbebørster
pl: Końcówki do szczotek do szorowania
pt: Cabeças e peças de reposição para escovas
ru: Насадки и сменные головки для скребковых щёток
sv: Skurborsthuvuden och -refiller
tr: Fırça Başlıkları ve Yedekleri